Utah statutes.
72-9-403.   Contribution between connecting motor carriers.

(1)  The motor carrier paying for the loss or damage to property transported or received is entitled to recovery from the motor carrier responsible for the loss or damage, or on the motor carrier's line the loss, damage, or injury was sustained.

(2)  The amount of the loss or damage is equal to the amount the motor carrier is required to pay to the persons entitled to the recovery.

